District of Columbia statutes.
29A-301.114

Repealed

Limited liability for an employee of the corporation.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, Pub. L. 87-569, § 114
as added Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-222, § 2, 40 DCR 587
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
1981 Ed., § 29-599.16.
2001 Ed., § 29-301.114.